Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,114
Hospital and ambulatory surgical center; reports required.

(1) Every hospital or ambulatory surgical center licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act shall annually report the following outpatient surgical and related information to the department no later than May 1 of each year for the preceding calendar year in a format as prescribed by the department in rule and regulation:

(a) The name of the reporting facility;

(b) The facility portion of billed charges for each patient served at such facility;

(c) The county and state of residence by zip code for each patient served at such facility;

(d) The primary outpatient surgical procedure performed for each patient at such facility;

(e) The primary payor for each patient served at such facility; and

(f) Such other outpatient surgical information as voluntarily reported by such facilities.

(2) The department may impose a late fee for failure to report such information as required by this section.

Laws 2003, LB 73, § 4.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.